Illinois, session 104th, SB678.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-102 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-102)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 3-102)7    Sec. 3-102. Terms defined. The The terms used in this 8Article have the meanings ascribed to them in Sections 3-103 9through 3-108.3, except when the context otherwise requires.10(Source: P.A. 90-507, eff. 8-22-97.)